New York, session 2025-2026, S2464.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 319 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 319. Mandatory student enrollment reporting. 1. All public schools 4 located within the state, regardless of level, shall report the number 5 of students enrolled in such school to the department triennially, on 6 October thirty-first, January thirty-first, and April thirtieth of each 7 year. 8 2. Each report shall be accompanied with supporting documentation of 9 such enrollment. For purposes of this section, the commissioner shall 10 determine what supporting documentation is necessary. 11 3. Each report shall be published and publicly shared on the school 12 district's website within one week of submission to the department. 13 4. For purposes of this section, "enrollment" shall mean the undupli- 14 cated count of all children registered to receive educational services 15 in grades kindergarten through twelve, including children in ungraded 16 programs. 17 § 2. Section 2854 of the education law is amended by adding a new 18 subdivision 4 to read as follows: 19 4. Mandatory student enrollment reporting. (a) All charter schools 20 located within the state shall report the number of students enrolled to 21 the department triennially, on October thirty-first, January thirty- 22 first, and April thirtieth of each year. 23 (b) Each report shall be accompanied with supporting documentation of 24 such enrollment. For purposes of this section, the commissioner shall 25 determine what supporting documentation is necessary. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06236-01-5 S. 2464 2 1 (c) Each report shall be published and publicly shared on the charter 2 school's website within one week of submission to the department. 3 (d) For purposes of this subdivision, "enrollment" shall mean the 4 unduplicated count of all children registered to receive educational 5 services in grades kindergarten through twelve, including children in 6 ungraded programs. 7 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 8 have become a law.